Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB855.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 116.025 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person who is a citizen of the United States, a resident of this state, and a
resident of the precinct in which he or she offers to vote on or before the day
preceding the closing of the registration books for any primary, regular[general], or
special election, who possesses on the day of any election the qualifications set
forth in Section 145 of the Constitution, exclusive of the durational residency
requirements, who is not disqualified under that section or under any other statute,
and who is registered as provided in this chapter, may vote for all officers to be
elected by the people and on all public questions submitted for determination at that
election, in the precinct in which he or she is qualified to vote. Any person who
shall have been convicted of any election law offense which is a felony shall not be
permitted to vote until his or her civil rights have been restored by executive
pardon.
(2) Any person charged with or indicted for a crime, whether or not in custody for
same, who has not yet been convicted of the offense and who is not otherwise
ineligible to vote, may vote for all offices to be elected by the people and on all
public questions submitted for determination at that election, in the precinct in
which he or she is qualified to vote.
(3) A registered voter who changes his or her place of residence from one (1) precinct
Page 1 of 4
BR225700.100 - 2257 - XXXX 3/3/2026 4:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2257
to another within the same county while the registration books are closed shall be
permitted to update the voting records and to vote in the present election at the
appropriate precinct for the current address as set forth in KRS 116.085(3).
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any registered voter who
changes his or her place of residence from one (1) precinct to another within the
same county prior to the closing of the registration books and who fails to transfer
his or her registration with the county clerk prior to the date the registration books
are closed shall be permitted to vote in the present election at the appropriate
precinct for the current address as set forth in KRS 116.085(2).
(5) Any registered voter who changes his or her place of residence to a different county
while the registration books are closed shall be permitted to vote at the appropriate
precinct for his or her former residence in the present election and shall thereafter
transfer his or her voter registration.
(6) Any registered voter who changes his or her place of residence to a different county
and fails to register to vote in the county of current residence prior to the date the
registration books are closed shall not be eligible to vote in the present election in
the county of current residence or the county of former residence.
(7) Any registered voter who changes his or her place of registration to a different state
while the registration books are closed in the new state of residence before a
presidential election shall be permitted to cast an absentee ballot for President and
Vice President only, notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, by mail or at the
county clerk's office of the former residence or other place designated by the county
board of elections and approved by the State Board of Elections.
(8) A person who is sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years of age on the date of the
election for which the person seeks to vote may vote only in elections for members
of a school board, upon adoption of a resolution by a majority of the members of
that district's school board delivered to the county clerk and State Board of
Page 2 of 4
BR225700.100 - 2257 - XXXX 3/3/2026 4:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2257
Elections at least three hundred sixty-five (365) days prior to the regular election
in which expanded suffrage is to take effect, provided that the person:
(a) Is a resident of the school district in which the election is held;
(b) Meets the residency requirements otherwise applicable to voters under
Kentucky law;
(c) Is a citizen of the United States of America;
(d) Has registered in the manner described in KRS 116.045 and in accordance
with administrative regulations promulgated by the State Board of
Elections; and
(e) Is not otherwise disqualified from voting pursuant to the Constitution of
Kentucky or applicable statutes.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 116 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) County clerks shall administer the registration and voting of persons sixteen (16)
and seventeen (17) years of age who are eligible under Section 1 of this Act using
existing polling locations, but may use separate election procedures and
registration systems.
(2) Voters who are sixteen (16) and seventeen (17) years of age are to receive ballots
limited to school board contests.
(3) The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as necessary for the administration of this
section. These regulations are not limited to, but shall include:
(a) A registration form and a process to register persons sixteen (16) and
seventeen (17) years of age to vote only in school board elections, which
shall conform as nearly as possible to the equivalent form and process used
for all other eligible voters;
(b) A method to verify the identity of registered voters who are sixteen (16) and
Page 3 of 4
BR225700.100 - 2257 - XXXX 3/3/2026 4:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2257
seventeen (17) years of age, which shall conform as nearly as possible to the
methods used for all other eligible voters under this chapter, and may
include a valid photo identification issued by a public or private secondary
school located within the Commonwealth;
(c) A design of ballots on which voters who are sixteen (16) and seventeen (17)
years of age may vote for school board members; and
(d) Implementation of the provisions of this section in a manner compatible
with the administration of all other elections conducted in this
Commonwealth.
Section 3. This Act shall apply to school board elections that occur on or after
January 1, 2028.
Page 4 of 4
BR225700.100 - 2257 - XXXX 3/3/2026 4:49 PM Jacketed